Maryland, session 2025, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Department” means the State Department of Assessments and Taxation.
10–104.
The income tax does not apply to the income of:
(1) a common trust fund, as defined in § 3–501(b) of the Financial
Institutions Article;
(2) except as provided in §§ 10–101(e)(3) of this subtitle and 10–304(2) of
this title, an organization that is exempt from taxation under § 408(e)(1) or § 501 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(3) a financial institution that is subject to the financial institution
franchise tax;
(4) a person subject to taxation under Title 6 of the Insurance Article;
(5) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle, a partnership, as
defined in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle and § 10–304(3) of this
title, an S corporation;
(7) except as provided in § 10–304(4) of this title, an investment conduit or
a special exempt entity; [or]
(8) except as provided in § 10–102.1 of this subtitle, a limited liability
company as defined under Title 4A of the Corporations and Associations Article to the
extent that the company is taxable as a partnership, as defined in § 761 of the Internal
Revenue Code; OR
(9) (I) AN INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD, AS
DEFINED UNDER § 10–110 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1286 3
(II) THE SPOUSE OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I)
OF THIS ITEM.
10–110.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE
ABROAD” MEANS A UNITED STATES NATIONAL WHO, DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR,
IS:
(1) UNLAWFULLY OR WRONGFULLY DETAINED ABROAD, AS
DETERMINED UNDER § 302 OF THE ROBERT LEVINSON HOSTAGE RECOVERY AND
HOSTAGE–TAKING ACCOUNTABILITY ACT; OR
(2) TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD, AS DETERMINED UNDER § 304 OF THE
ROBERT LEVINSON HOSTAGE RECOVERY AND HOSTAGE–TAKING
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT,
SHALL:
(1) REGULARLY CONTACT THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF STATE FOR
INFORMATION ON INDIVIDUALS DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD;
(2) MAINTAIN A LIST OF INDIVIDUALS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(3) SHARE THE LIST PREPARED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION WITH THE COLLECTOR FOR EACH COUNTY, AS DEFINED UNDER §
1–101 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–251.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE
ABROAD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–110 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO PROPERTY TAX IF THE PROPERTY:
(1) IS OWNED BY:

HOUSE BILL 1286
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD; OR
(II) THE SPOUSE OF AN INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN
HOSTAGE ABROAD; AND
(2) (I) IS ACTUALLY AND EXCLUSIVELY USED BY THE SPOUSE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD; OR
(II) WAS ACTUALLY AND EXCLUSIVELY USED BY AN INDIVIDUAL
DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE ABROAD UNTIL THE INDIVIDUAL WAS WRONGFULLY
DETAINED OR TAKEN HOSTAGE.
(C) AN EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE GRANTED IN ADDITION
TO ANY OTHER EXEMPTION AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(D) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY
AUTHORIZE, BY LAW, A REFUND TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE
EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION FOR ANY COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROPERTY TAX PAID IN THE TAXABLE YEARS IN WHICH AN EXEMPTION WAS
AUTHORIZED BUT NOT GRANTED.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.